Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 6 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY LAW
43-4-612. Referendum.

No action by an authority to establish or increase any tax authorized by this part 6 shall take effect unless first submitted to a vote of the registered electors of that portion of the combination or that portion of the territory in which a transportation planning organization is authorized to exercise the powers of an authority in which the tax is proposed to be collected.

The effective date of any sales or use tax adopted under this part 6 must be either January 1 or July 1 following the date of the election in which the sales or use tax is approved, and the board shall notify the executive director of the department of revenue of the adoption of a sales or use tax proposal at least forty-five days prior to the effective date of the tax. If a sales or use tax proposal is approved at an election held less than forty-five days prior to the January 1 or July 1 following the date of the election, the tax shall not be effective until the next succeeding January 1 or July 1.

No action by an authority creating a multiple fiscal year debt or other financial obligation that is subject to section 20 (4)(b) of article X of the state constitution shall take effect unless first submitted to a vote of the registered electors residing within the boundaries of the authority; except that no such vote is required for obligations of regional transportation activity enterprises established under section 43-4-606 or for obligations of any other enterprise under section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution.

The questions proposed to the registered electors under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be submitted at a general election or any election to be held on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year. The action shall not take effect unless a majority of the registered electors voting thereon at the election vote in favor thereof. The election shall be conducted in substantially the same manner as county elections, and the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the election is conducted shall assist the authority in conducting the election. The authority shall pay the costs incurred by each county in conducting such an election. No moneys of the authority may be used to urge or oppose passage of an election required under this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 495, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 1068, § 12, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1436, § 41, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-613. Notice - opportunity for comment.

The board of any authority created pursuant to this part 6, at least forty-five days prior to any meeting at which the board shall consider or take action on a proposal to establish, increase, or decrease any tax or fee authorized by this part 6, shall deliver written notice of the meeting and proposal to any county and any municipality where the proposed tax or fee would be imposed. Prior to the taking of any action on any such proposal by the board of any authority, counties, and municipalities entitled to receive notice pursuant to this section shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity for comment, either at a regular meeting of the board or at a special meeting convened to receive such comment.

The board of any authority created pursuant to this part 6, at least seven business days prior to any regularly scheduled meeting, shall make available to the public written or electronic notice of the time and agenda of such meeting. The board shall designate during each meeting a public comment period that shall be at least one hour in duration and shall offer the public an opportunity to comment during such period. Such period may be abridged when the public is finished offering comments.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 495, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 401, § 2, effective August 7.

43-4-614. Notice - coordination of information.

At least forty-five days prior to the creation of any authority pursuant to this part 6, a notice containing the proposed boundaries of the authority and the methods proposed for financing regional transportation systems in the authority shall be sent to the division and to the department of revenue.

At least forty-five days prior to the imposition of or any increase in any fee or tax or prior to the issuance of any bonds authorized in this part 6, a notice specifying the amount of the fee or tax and its proposed duration or the value and number of bonds to be issued shall be sent to the division. The notice required by this paragraph (b) is not necessary if the required information has previously been provided in the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

At the time the notice required in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (1) is sent to the division, a copy of the notice shall be filed with the state auditor and the transportation commission.

The division shall forward copies of any such notice to the department of transportation if the division determines that the proposed authority or the tax, fee, or bonds will have an impact on any operations of that department.

The division shall file an annual report with the state auditor and transportation commission concerning the activities of authorities created pursuant to this part 6. The report shall detail how many authorities have been created, describe their boundaries, and specify the regional transportation systems that are being provided and how they are being financed.

The division shall notify the state auditor and the transportation commission either in the report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or by letter, if it deems that immediate notification is warranted, of any situation relating to the creation of an authority, the imposition of any fee or tax, or the issuance of any bonds by an authority that the division believes or has reason to believe will adversely affect the tax-raising ability or the credit or bond rating of any governmental unit.

The board and staff of the authority shall cooperate with the transportation legislation review committee in carrying out the committee's duties pursuant to section 43-2-145 (1.9).

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 496, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 874, § 15, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1068, § 13, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (3)(a), see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-615. Agreement of the state not to limit or alter rights of obligees.

The state hereby pledges and agrees with the holders of any bonds issued under this part 6 and with those parties who enter into contracts with an authority or any member of a combination or member of a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority as authorized by section 43-4-622 pursuant to this part 6 that the state will not impair the rights vested in the authority or the rights or obligations of any person with which the authority contracts to fulfill the terms of any agreements made pursuant to this part 6. The state further agrees that it will not impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any bonds of the authority until the bonds have been paid or until adequate provision for payment has been made. The authority may include this provision and undertaking for the state in the bonds.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 497, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1436, § 42, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-616. Investments.

An authority may invest or deposit any funds in the manner provided by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. In addition, an authority may direct a corporate trustee that holds funds of the authority to invest or deposit the funds in investments or deposits other than those specified by said part 6 if the board determines, by resolution, that the investment or deposit meets the standard established in section 15-1-304, C.R.S., the income is at least comparable to income available on investments or deposits specified by said part 6, and the investment will assist the authority in the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of regional transportation systems.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 497, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1068, § 14, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

43-4-617. Bonds eligible for investment.

All banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any moneys within their control in any bonds issued under this part 6. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in the bonds only if the bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 497, § 1, effective August 6.

43-4-618. Exemption from taxation - securities laws.

The income or other revenues of an authority, all properties at any time owned by an authority, any bonds issued by an authority, and the transfer of and the income from any bonds issued by an authority are exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state. In the resolution or indenture authorizing the bonds, an authority may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on the bonds.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 497, § 1, effective August 6.

43-4-619. No action maintainable.

An action or proceeding at law or in equity to review any acts or proceedings or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act or proceedings or the issuance of any bonds or for any other relief against or from any acts or proceedings done under this part 6, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall not be maintained unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or proceedings or the effective date thereof, whichever occurs first, and is thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 497, § 1, effective August 6.

43-4-620. Judicial examination of powers, acts, proceedings, or contracts of an authority.

In its discretion, the board of an authority may file a petition at any time in the district court in and for any county in which the authority is located wholly or in part praying for a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred to the authority, any revenue-raising power exercised or that may be exercised by the authority, or any act, proceeding, or contract of the authority, whether or not the contract has been executed. The judicial examination and determination shall be conducted in substantially the manner set forth in section 32-4-540, C.R.S.; except that the notice required shall be published once a week for three consecutive weeks and the hearing shall be held not less than thirty days or more than forty days after the filing of the petition.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 498, § 1, effective August 6.

43-4-621. Calculation of fiscal year spending limit - first full fiscal year's spending as base.

For the purpose of determining any authority's fiscal year spending limit under section 20 (7)(b) of article X of the state constitution, the initial spending base of the authority shall be the amount of revenues collected by the authority from sources not excluded from fiscal year spending pursuant to section 20 (2)(e) of article X of the state constitution during the first full fiscal year for which the authority collected revenues.

For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means any year-long period used by an authority for fiscal accounting purposes.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1177, § 4, effective August 2.

43-4-622. Exercise of authority powers by transportation planning organization.

By adopting a resolution, the board of a transportation planning organization may authorize itself to exercise some or all of the powers of an authority set forth in this part 6 within the region or any portion of the region of the transportation planning organization.

The exercise of the powers of an authority by a transportation planning organization is subject to all requirements and limitations set forth in this part 6 or any other law including, but not limited to:

The notice requirements set forth in sections 43-4-603 (1), 43-4-613, and 43-4-614 (1);

The intergovernmental agreement and services elimination requirements set forth in section 43-4-603 (1.5);

The public hearing requirements set forth in section 43-4-603 (3);

The limitations on the board delegating certain powers set forth in section 43-4-604 (1);

All requirements set forth in this part 6 that require the consent of a county or municipality that is not a member of the transportation planning organization to operations, taxation, or other activities within its territory;

All board super-majority voting requirements set forth in this part 6; and

The voter approval requirements set forth in section 43-4-612.

Before commencing construction of a regional transportation system, a transportation planning organization exercising the powers of an authority shall comply with the procedures and guidelines adopted by the transportation commission pursuant to section 43-1-128 (3) and analyze and document to the department of transportation the system's anticipated impacts on the achievement of the state greenhouse gas pollution goals set forth in section 25-7-102 (2)(g) and on compliance with applicable standards under the attainment program created and developed pursuant to part 3 of article 7 of title 25. Upon the request of a rural transportation planning organization, the department of transportation shall provide technical assistance to facilitate the completion of the analysis.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 6 to the contrary, a transportation planning organization may not exercise any of the powers of an authority within the boundaries of an existing authority without the prior approval of the board of the existing authority by adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the directors of the board. The board of the existing authority shall file any such resolution adopted with the director of the division. The director of the division shall not issue the certificate required by section 43-4-603 (1) to a transportation planning organization, if the transportation planning organization is attempting to exercise the powers of an authority within the boundaries of an existing authority without the existing authority's duly adopted and filed resolution of approval.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1437, § 43, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.